Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 55.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-155
Governing law.

(ULLCA 801) (a) The law of the state or
other jurisdiction under which a foreign limited liability company is formed
governs:

(1) the internal affairs
of the company; and

(2)
the liability of a member as member and a manager as manager for the debts,
obligations, or other liabilities of the company.

(b) A foreign limited liability
company may not transact business in this state until it qualifies with the
Secretary of State as provided in sections 21-156 and 21-158. A foreign limited
liability company may not be denied a certificate of authority by reason of
any difference between the law of the jurisdiction under which the company
is formed and the law of this state.

(c) A certificate of authority does not authorize
a foreign limited liability company to engage in any business or exercise
any power that a limited liability company may not engage in or exercise in
this state.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 55.
January 1, 2011